Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6932YC (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 8.42 High-impact federal grants. 1 1. For purposes of this section: 2 a. âFederal guidance documentâ means a written statement, 3 memorandum, letter, bulletin, or advisory that is issued by the 4 federal government to a department or establishment and that 5 suggests or mandates a specific policy, procedure, or outcome 6 as a condition of receiving a high-impact federal grant. 7 b. âHigh-impact federal grantâ means an award of financial 8 assistance by the federal government to a department or 9 establishment, including but not limited to a grant, loan, or 10 cooperative agreement, that does any of the following: 11 (1) Exceeds five million dollars in one state fiscal year. 12 (2) Requires a state matching expenditure of any amount. 13 (3) Requires the state to enact legislation. 14 2. A department or establishment shall not apply for or 15 accept a high-impact federal grant unless the department or 16 establishment has received prior approval from the general 17 assembly by law or from the legislative council if the general 18 assembly is not in session. 19 3. Prior to applying for or accepting a high-impact federal 20 grant, a department or establishment shall submit a federal 21 grant request report to the legislative services agency in a 22 manner determined by the legislative services agency. The 23 report must include all of the following: 24 a. The duration and dollar amount of the grant. 25 b. Any condition or requirement that is a condition of 26 receiving the grant. 27 c. A detailed analysis of any required state matching 28 moneys, including a maintenance of effort requirement. 29 d. A withdrawal plan describing how the department or 30 establishment will change the program or service funded by the 31 grant if the grant is reduced or eliminated. 32 4. The legislative services agency shall post federal grant 33 request reports on the general assemblyâs internet site. 34 5. A department or establishment that receives a federal 35 -1- LSB 6932YC (1) 91 sc/ns 1/ 3 H.F. _____ guidance document shall submit to the legislative services 1 agency, in a manner determined by the legislative services 2 agency, all of the following: 3 a. A copy of the federal guidance document within ten 4 business days of receipt by the department or establishment. 5 b. A guidance impact statement summarizing the operational 6 and fiscal impact of complying with the federal guidance. 7 6. The legislative services agency shall maintain on the 8 general assemblyâs internet site a publicly accessible database 9 of all federal guidance documents received from a department 10 or establishment. 11